Florida, session 2026, SB1392.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 12 316.075, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 316.075âTraffic control signal devices.â 14 (1)âExcept for automatic warning signal lights installed or 15 to be installed at railroad crossings, whenever traffic, 16 including municipal traffic, is controlled by traffic control 17 signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted 18 arrows, successively one at a time or in combination, only the 19 colors green, red, and yellow shall be used, except for special 20 pedestrian signals carrying a word legend, and the lights shall 21 indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as 22 follows: 23 (c)âSteady red indication.â 24 1.âVehicular traffic facing a steady red signal shall stop 25 before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the 26 intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection 27 and shall remain standing until a green indication is shown; 28 however: 29 a.âThe driver of a vehicle which is stopped at a clearly 30 marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on 31 the near side of the intersection, or, if none then at the point 32 nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of 33 approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering 34 the intersection in obedience to a steady red signal may make a 35 right turn, but shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and 36 other traffic proceeding as directed by the signal at the 37 intersection, except that municipal and county authorities may 38 prohibit any such right turn against a steady red signal at any 39 intersection, which prohibition shall be effective when a sign 40 giving notice thereof is erected in a location visible to 41 traffic approaching the intersection. Right turns under this 42 sub-subparagraph are prohibited at intersections using traffic 43 infraction detectors pursuant to ss. 316.0083 and 316.0776, and 44 a sign giving notice of such prohibition must be erected in a 45 location visible to traffic approaching the intersection. 46 b.âThe driver of a vehicle on a one-way street that 47 intersects another one-way street on which traffic moves to the 48 left shall stop in obedience to a steady red signal, but may 49 then make a left turn into the one-way street, but shall yield 50 the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic proceeding as 51 directed by the signal at the intersection, except that 52 municipal and county authorities may prohibit any such left turn 53 as described, which prohibition shall be effective when a sign 54 giving notice thereof is attached to the traffic control signal 55 device at the intersection. 56 2.a.âThe driver of a vehicle facing a steady red signal 57 shall stop before entering the crosswalk and remain stopped to 58 allow a pedestrian, with a permitted signal, to cross a roadway 59 when the pedestrian is in the crosswalk or steps into the 60 crosswalk and is upon the half of the roadway upon which the 61 vehicle is traveling or when the pedestrian is approaching so 62 closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in 63 danger. 64 b.âUnless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal 65 as provided in s. 316.0755, pedestrians facing a steady red 66 signal shall not enter the roadway. 67 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.